Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1671
County court; advance jury selection; when authorized.

All parties to an action which is filed with a county court of this state may agree that the jury may be selected up to thirty-one days prior to the date of trial. The stipulation must be unanimous among all parties and evidenced by a joint stipulation to the court.

Laws 1996, LB 1249, § 1;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 25-1631;

Laws 2020, LB387, § 28.